Arkansas, session 2025, HB1825.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-16-152(b)(1), concerning the requirement
to earn one (1) unit of credit under the Computer Science Education
Advancement Act of 2021, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Beginning with the entering ninth grade class of 2022-2023 in
the 2025-2026 school year, a public high school student shall be required may
require an enrolled student to earn one (1) unit of credit in a Department of
Education-approved high school computer science or computer science-related
career and technical education course before the student graduates.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-16-152(b), concerning the requirement to
earn one (1) unit of credit under the Computer Science Education Advancement
*TNL295*
04-03-2025 11:54:27 TNL295

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1825
Act of 2021, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
"(5) The division shall:
(A) Review career and technical education courses to
determine how computer science standards may be embedded into appropriate
courses; and
(B) Identify the career and technical education courses
that meet a computer science credit if required by a public high school under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

/s/Wooldridge


























04-03-2025 11:54:27 TNL295